New York, session 2025-2026, S9253.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 208 of the civil service law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 4-a to read as follows: 3 4-a. (a) Within thirty days of a public employee who is designated as 4 managerial or confidential pursuant to subdivision seven of section two 5 hundred one of this article first being employed or reemployed by a 6 public employer, or within thirty days of being promoted or transferred 7 within the existing employing agency or a new employing agency, the 8 public employer shall notify an organization that advocates for manage- 9 rial or confidential employees, as such employees are designated pursu- 10 ant to subdivision seven of section two hundred one of this article, of 11 such employee's name, address, job title, employing agency, department 12 or other operating unit, and work location; and 13 (b) Within thirty days of providing notice in paragraph (a) of this 14 subdivision, a public employer shall allow a duly appointed represen- 15 tative of the organization that advocates for managerial or confidential 16 employees, as such employees are designated pursuant to subdivision 17 seven of section two hundred one of this article, to meet with such 18 employee for a reasonable amount of time during such employee's work 19 time without charge to leave credits, unless otherwise specified within 20 an existing agreement, policy or procedure currently existing for public 21 employees who are designated managerial or confidential, provided, 22 however, that the arrangements for such meeting must be scheduled in 23 consultation with a designated representative of the public employer; 24 and 25 (c) Upon the request of the organization that advocates for managerial 26 or confidential employees, as such employees are designated pursuant to 27 subdivision seven of section two hundred one of this article, and if the 28 public employer conducts new employee orientations, the public employer EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04584-01-5 S. 9253 2 1 shall provide an organization that advocates for managerial or confiden- 2 tial employees, as such employees are designated pursuant to subdivision 3 seven of section two hundred one of this article, mandatory access to 4 such new employee orientations. Such organization shall receive not less 5 than ten days' notice in advance of an orientation, except that a short- 6 er notice may be provided in a specific instance where there is an 7 urgent need critical to the employer's operations that was not reason- 8 ably foreseeable to provide such notice. The structure, time, and manner 9 of exclusive representative access shall be determined through mutual 10 agreement between such organization and the employer. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.